New Mexico, session 2026, SB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Gross Receipts and Compensating Tax Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] DEDUCTION--GROSS RECEIPTS TAX--DYED DIESEL.-- A. Prior to July 1, 2031, receipts from the sale of special fuel dyed in accordance with federal regulations may be deducted from gross receipts. B. A taxpayer allowed a deduction pursuant to this section shall report the amount of the deduction separately in a manner required by the department. C. The deduction provided by this section shall be included in the tax expenditure budget pursuant to Section 7-1-84 NMSA 1978, including the annual aggregate cost of the deduction." SECTION 2. REPEAL.--Section 7-9-58.1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2024, Chapter 67, Section 15) is repealed. SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2026. - 2 -